Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-115
Marriage according to custom of religious society; certificate; transmission to county clerk.

It shall be lawful for every religious society to join together in marriage such persons as are of the society, according to the rites and customs of the society to which they belong. The clerk or keeper of the minutes, proceedings, or other book of the religious society in which such marriage shall be had, or if there be no such clerk or keeper of the minutes, then the moderator or person presiding in such society, shall make out and transmit to the county clerk of the county a certificate of the marriage, and the same shall be recorded in the same manner as is provided in sections 42-108 to 42-112.

R.S.1866, c. 34, § 15, p. 256;

R.S.1913, § 1554;

C.S.1922, § 1503;

C.S.1929, § 42-115;

R.S.1943, § 42-115;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 11.

Marriage solemnized under this section is valid. Collins v. Hoag & Rollins, 122 Neb. 805, 241 N.W. 766 (1932).